apertium-umu.umu.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Munsee

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <np>     # Proper Noun
# <ant>    # Anthroponym (First Names)
# <v>      # Verb
# <iv>     # Intransitive Verb
# <tv>     # Transitive Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <adv>    # Adverb
# <num>    # Numeral
# <aa>     # Animate Noun
# <nn>     # Inanimate Noun
# <prn>    # Pronoun
# <dem>    # Demonstrative
# <vaux>   # Auxiliary Verb
# <mod>    # Modal word
# <det>    # Determiner
# <cnjcoo> # Coordinating conjunction
# <cnjsub> # Subordinating conjunction
# <ref>    # Reflexive
# <emph>   # Emphatic
# <ij>     # Interjection

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular

# Grammatical Person
# <pers>   # Personal
# <p1>     # First Person
# <p2>     # Second Person
# <p3>     # Third Person

# Subject Marking
# <s_1sg>  # First person singular subject
# <s_2sg>  # Second person singular subject
# <s_3sg>  # Third person singular subject
# <s_1pl>  # First person plural subject
# <s_2pl>  # Second person plural subject
# <s_3pl>  # Third person plural subject

# Object Marking
# <o_1sg>  # First person singular object
# <o_2sg>  # Second person singular object
# <o_3sg>  # Third person singular object
# <o_1pl>  # First person plural object
# <o_2pl>  # Second person plural object
# <o_3pl>  # Third person plural object 
# <o_sg>  # singular object 
# <o_pl>  # plural object 
# <o_3>    # obviative

# Possession
# <px1sg>  # First person singular possessive
# <px2sg>  # Second person singular possessive
# <px3sg>  # Third person singular possessive
# <px11pl>  # First person plural possessive (exclusive)
# <px12pl>  # First person plural possessive (inclusive)
# <px2pl>  # Second person plural possessive
# <px3pl>  # Third person plural possessive

# Miscellaneous Suffix Tags
# <abs>    # Absence
# <meat>   # Meat of
# <loc>    # Locative
# <neg>    # Negative

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
## Example inflection pattern:
# NounRoot RegNounInfl
Animate-Nouns
Inanimate-Nouns
Intransitive-Animate-Verbs
Intransitive-Inanimate-Verbs
Transitive-Animate-Verbs
Transitive-Inanimate-Verbs
Number
Punctuation
Adjectives
Pronouns
Adverbs
Coord-Conj
#Sub-Conj
Emphatics
Modal-Words
Determiner
Demonstratives
Interjections
Imperative

PATTERN Animate-Nouns
:Animate-N-Infl(1) Animate-N-Stems [<n><aa>:] Animate-N-Infl(2) Absence-Infl?  Locative-Infl?
:Animate-N-Infl(1) Proper-Nouns(1) [<np>:] Proper-Nouns(2) Animate-N-Infl(2) Absence-Infl?  Locative-Infl?

PATTERN Inanimate-Nouns
:Inanimate-N-Infl(1) Inanimate-N-Stems [<n><nn>:] Inanimate-N-Infl(2) Locative-Infl?

PATTERN Intransitive-Animate-Verbs
:Intransitive-Animate-V-Infl(1) Intransitive-Animate-V-Stems [<v><iv><aa>:] Intransitive-Animate-V-Infl(2)

PATTERN Intransitive-Inanimate-Verbs
:Intransitive-Inanimate-V-Infl(1) Intransitive-Inanimate-V-Stems [<v><iv><nn>:] Intransitive-Inanimate-V-Infl(2)

PATTERN Transitive-Animate-Verbs
:Transitive-Animate-V-Infl(1) Transitive-Animate-V-Stems [<v><tv><aa>:] Transitive-Animate-V-Infl(2)

PATTERN Transitive-Inanimate-Verbs
:Transitive-Inanimate-V-Infl(1) Transitive-Inanimate-V-Stems [<v><tv><nn>:] Transitive-Inanimate-V-Infl(2)

PATTERN Imperative
Intransitive-Animate-V-Stems [<v><iv><aa><imp>:] VAI-Imperative-Infl
Transitive-Animate-V-Stems [<v><tv><aa><imp>:] VTA-Imperative-Infl


# QUESTION: Unstable vs stable verb stems (how do we tell them apart and should we bother)? Seems important for twol rules.
# QUESTION: Can we make a twol rule only apply to verbs? 
# QUESTION: Verb class VTAO worth adding? --> very little on Munsee Grammar
# QUESTION: For final project- how many verb phrases is sufficient? 50?


PATTERN Pronouns
Pronoun-Stems [<prn>:] Pronoun-Infl

LEXICON Animate-N-Infl(2)

# Non-Plural Animate Nouns
:     <sg>:

# Plural Animate Nouns
:    <pl>:>ak

# TODO: consider just using the ? instead of Dir/LR
# Singular Possessor, Singular Possessed Quantity
:{N}{t}{U}> <px1sg><full>:>um 
:{N}{t}{U}> <px1sg>:
:k{t}{U}> <px2sg>:>um #Dir/LR
:k{t}{U}> <px2sg>:
:w{t}{U}> <px3sg>:>um #Dir/LR
:w{t}{U}> <px3sg>:  

# Plural Possessor, Singular Possessed Quantity
:n{t}{U}> <px11pl>:>um>una #Dir/LR
:n{t}{U}> <px11pl>:>una
:k{t}{U}> <px12pl>:>um>una #Dir/LR
:k{t}{U}> <px12pl>:>una
:{N}{t}{U}> <px2pl>:>um>uwa #Dir/LR
:{N}{t}{U}> <px2pl>:>uwa
:{k}{t}{U}> <px3pl>:>um>uwaawal #Dir/LR
:{k}{t}{U}> <px3pl>:>uwaawal

# Singular Possessor, Plural Possessed Quantity
:{N}{t}{U}> <px1sg><pl>:>um>ak #Dir/LR
:{N}{t}{U}> <px1sg><pl>:>ak
:k{t}{U}> <px2sg><pl>:>um>ak #Dir/LR
:k{t}{U}> <px2sg><pl>:>ak
:w{t}{U}> <px3sg><pl>:>um>al #Dir/LR
:w{t}{U}> <px3sg><pl>:>al    

# Plural Possessor, Plural Possessed Quantity
:{N}{t}{U}> <px11pl><pl>:>um>una #Dir/LR
:{N}{t}{U}> <px11pl><pl>:>una
:k{t}{U}> <px12pl><pl>:>um>una #Dir/LR
:k{t}{U}> <px12pl><pl>:>una
:{N}{t}{U}> <px2pl><pl>:>um>uwa #Dir/LR
:{N}{t}{U}> <px2pl><pl>:>uwa
:{k}{t}{U}> <px3pl><pl>:>um>uwaawal #Dir/LR
:{k}{t}{U}> <px3pl><pl>:>uwaawal

# Obviatives
:   <o_3>:>al

LEXICON Inanimate-N-Infl(2)

# Non-Plural Inanimate Nouns
:    <sg>:

# Plural Inanimate Nouns
:    <pl>:>al

# Singular Possessor, Singular Possessed Quantity
:{N}{t}{U}> <px1sg>:>um #Dir/LR
:{N}{t}{U}> <px1sg>:
:k{t}{U}> <px2sg>:>um #Dir/LR
:k{t}{U}> <px2sg>:
:w{t}{U}> <px3sg>:>um #Dir/LR
:w{t}{U}> <px3sg>:> 

# Plural Possessor, Singular Possessed Quantity
:{N}{t}{U}> <px11pl>:>um>una #Dir/LR
:{N}{t}{U}> <px11pl>:>una
:{N}{t}{U}> <px12pl>:>um>una #Dir/LR
:{N}{t}{U}> <px12pl>:>una
:k{t}{U}> <px2pl>:>um>uwa #Dir/LR
:k{t}{U}> <px2pl>:>uwa
:w{t}{U}> <px3pl>:>um>uwaawal #Dir/LR
:w{t}{U}> <px3pl>:>uwaawal

# Singular Possessor, Plural Possessed Quantity
:{N}{t}{U}> <px1sg><pl>:>um>al #Dir/LR
:{N}{t}{U}> <px1sg><pl>:>al
:k{t}{U}> <px2sg><pl>:>um>al #Dir/LR
:k{t}{U}> <px2sg><pl>:>al
:w{t}{U}> <px3sg><pl>:>um>uwa #Dir/LR
:w{t}{U}> <px3sg><pl>:>uwa 

# Plural Possessor, Plural Possessed Quantity
:{N}{t}{U}> <px11pl>:>um>una #Dir/LR
:{N}{t}{U}> <px11pl>:>una
:{N}{t}{U}> <px12pl>:>um>una #Dir/LR
:{N}{t}{U}> <px12pl>:>una
:k{t}{U}> <px2pl>:>um>uwa #Dir/LR
:k{t}{U}> <px2pl>:>uwa
:w{t}{U}> <px3pl>:>um>uwaawal #Dir/LR
:w{t}{U}> <px3pl>:>uwaawalmŭtáanheew

LEXICON Locative-Infl
<loc>:>ung
<loc>:>eeng
<loc>:>iing
<loc>:>oong

LEXICON Absence-Infl
<abs>:>áya

LEXICON Intransitive-Inanimate-V-Infl(2)

# Intransitive Inanimate Verbs
:    <s_sg>:>{Z} # no w for consonant-ending stems
:   <s_pl>:>{W}{A}l # consonant endings take -ool NEED TWOL RULE

# Negative VIIs
:   <neg><s_sg>:>{o}{o}wi
:   <neg><s_pl>:>{o}{o}wiiwal  # consonant endings take oo

LEXICON Intransitive-Animate-V-Infl(2)
:{N}{t}{U}>   <s_1sg>:>{m}
:{N}{t}{U}>   <s_1sg>:  # Dir/LR
:{k}{t}{U}>   <s_2sg>:>{m}
:{k}{t}{U}>   <s_2sg>:> # Dir/LR
:        <s_3sg>:>{Z}     
:{N}{t}{U}> <s_11pl>:>{ó}hna
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_12pl>:>{ó}hna
:{k}{t}{U}>   <s_2pl>:>{ó}hmwa
:        <s_3pl>:>{W}{A}k      # Stem ending in vowels - oo for consonants

# Negative VAIs
:{N}{t}{U}>   <neg><s_1sg>:>{o}{o}wi
:{k}{t}{U}>   <neg><s_2sg>:>{o}{o}wi
:        <neg><s_3sg>:>{o}{o}wi    
:{N}{t}{U}> <neg><s_11pl>:>{o}{o}wíhna
:{k}{t}{U}> <neg><s_12pl>:>{o}{o}wíhna
:{k}{t}{U}>   <neg><s_2pl>:>{o}{o}wíhmwa
:        <neg><s_3pl>:>{o}{o}wíiwak   


LEXICON Transitive-Inanimate-V-Infl(2)

# Transitive Inanimate Verbs w/ Noun Object
:{N}{t}{U}> <s_1sg>:>{m}
:{N}{t}{U}> <s_1sg>:        # Dir/LR
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_2sg>:>{m}
:{k}{t}u> <s_2sg>:>{m}  # Dir/LR
:{k}{t}ŭ> <s_2sg>:>{m}  # Dir/LR
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_2sg>:        # Dir/LR
:{k}{t}u> <s_2sg>:        # Dir/LR
:{k}{t}ŭ> <s_2sg>:        # Dir/LR
   :        <s_3sg>:>{Z}    
:{N}{t}{U}> <s_11pl>:>{ó}hna
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_12pl>:>{ó}hna    
:{k}{t}u> <s_12pl>:>{ó}hna   # Dir/LR
:{k}{t}ŭ> <s_12pl>:>{ó}hna   # Dir/LR
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_2pl>:>{ó}hmwa
:{k}{t}u> <s_2pl>:>{ó}hmwa   # Dir/LR
:{k}{t}ŭ> <s_2pl>:>{ó}hmwa   # Dir/LR
:           <s_3pl>:>{W}{A}k

# Transitive Inanimate Verbs w/ Singular Object
:{N}{t}{U}> <s_1sg><o_sg>:>{u}n
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_2sg><o_sg>:>{u}n
:{k}{t}u> <s_2sg><o_sg>:>{u}n   # Dir/LR
:{k}{t}ŭ> <s_2sg><o_sg>:>{u}n   # Dir/LR
:{w}{t}{U}> <s_3sg><o_sg>:>{u}n    
:{N}{t}{U}> <s_11pl><o_sg>:>{u}>neen
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_12pl><o_sg>:>{u}>neen
:{k}{t}u> <s_12pl><o_sg>:>{u}>neen  # Dir/LR
:{k}{t}ŭ> <s_12pl><o_sg>:>{u}>neen  # Dir/LR
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_2pl><o_sg>:>{u}>neewa
:{k}{t}u> <s_2pl><o_sg>:>{u}>neewa  # Dir/LR
:{k}{t}ŭ> <s_2pl><o_sg>:>{u}>neewa  # Dir/LR
:{w}{t}{U}> <s_3pl><o_sg>:>{u}>neewa

# Transitive Inanimate Verbs w/ Plural Object
:{N}{t}{U}> <s_1sg><o_pl>:>{u}{'}n>al
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_2sg><o_pl>:>{u}{'}n>al   
:{w}{t}{U}> <s_3sg><o_pl>:>{u}{'}n>al  
:{N}{t}{U}> <s_11pl><o_pl>:>{u}{'}>neen
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_12pl><o_pl>:>{u}{'}>neen
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_2pl><o_pl>:>{u}{'}>ne{'}ewa
:{w}{t}{U}> <s_3pl><o_pl>:>{u}{'}>ne{'}ewa

# NEED NEGATIVES

LEXICON Transitive-Animate-V-Infl(2)

# WE HAVE NOT ACCOUNTED FOR FIRST AND SECOND PERSON OBJECTS

# Transitive Animate Verbs w/ Singular Object
:{N}{t}{U}> <s_1sg><o_3sg>:>aaw
:{N}{t}{U}> <s_1sg><o_3sg>:>a
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_2sg><o_3sg>:>aaw  
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_2sg><o_3sg>:>a
:{w}{t}{U}> <s_3sg><o_3sg>:>aawal
:{N}{t}{U}> <s_11pl><o_3sg>:>aawuna
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_12pl><o_3sg>:>aawuna
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_2pl><o_3sg>:>aawa
:{w}{t}{U}> <s_3pl><o_3sg>:>aawaawal
:{w}{t}{U}> <s_3pl><o_3sg>:>aawal

# Negatives: VTAs w/ Singular Object
:{N}{t}{U}> <neg><s_1sg><o_3sg>:>aawi
:{k}{t}{U}> <neg><s_2sg><o_3sg>:>aawi 
:{w}{t}{U}> <neg><s_3sg><o_3sg>:>aawiiwal
:{N}{t}{U}> <neg><s_11pl><o_3sg>:>aawiiwuna
:{k}{t}{u}> <neg><s_12pl><o_3sg>:>aawiiwuna
:{k}{t}{U}> <neg><s_2pl><o_3sg>:>aawiiwa
:{w}{t}{U}> <neg><s_3pl><o_3sg>:>aawiiwaawal

# Transitive Animate Verbs w/ Plural Object
:{N}{t}{U}> <s_1sg><o_3pl>:>aawak
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_2sg><o_3pl>:>aawak 
:{w}{t}{U}> <s_3sg><o_3pl>:>aawal
:{N}{t}{U}> <s_11pl><o_3pl>:>aawuna
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_12pl><o_3pl>:>aawuna
:{k}{t}{U}> <s_2pl><o_3pl>:>aawa
:{w}{t}{U}> <s_3pl><o_3pl>:>aawaawal

# Negatives: VTAs w/ Plural Object
:{N}{t}{U}> <neg><s_1sg><o_3pl>:>aawiiwak
:{k}{t}{U}> <neg><s_2sg><o_3pl>:>aawiiwak 
:{w}{t}{U}> <neg><s_3sg><o_3pl>:>aawiiwal
:{N}{t}{U}> <neg><s_11pl><o_3pl>:>aawiiwuna
:{k}{t}{U}> <neg><s_12pl><o_3pl>:>aawiiwuna
:{k}{t}{U}> <neg><s_2pl><o_3pl>:>aawiiwa
:{w}{t}{U}> <neg><s_3pl><o_3pl>:>aawiiwaawal


### IMPERATIVES ###

LEXICON VAI-Imperative-Infl
<s_2sg>:>{l}{i}{h}
<s_2pl>:>{o}{o}kw
<s_12pl>:>{o}{o}tookw

LEXICON VTA-Imperative-Infl
<s_2sg><o_1sg>:>iil
<s_2sg><o_3sg>: 
<s_2sg><o_3pl>:
<s_2pl><o_1sg>:>iikw
<s_2pl><o_3sg>:>ooh
<s_2pl><o_3pl>:>ooh
<s_12pl><o_1sg>:>iineen
<s_12pl><o_3sg>:>aatookw
<s_12pl><o_3pl>:>aatookw

LEXICON Pronoun-Infl

<pl>:>iik
<obv>:>iil
<pl><obv>:>iil

# problems
# curly brackets on vowels on the RIGHT side of the colon
# all things with prefixes don't know that they must be possessed!!
# determiners???

# Questions
# What are the ? and Dir/LR doing? Do we need both?
# What corpus.txt
# spellrelax vs curly brackets
# How to do twol rules and for what (not really any patterns, contractions?)


###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

## Example stem lexicon:
# LEXICON NounRoot
# house:house   # A noun
